src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-hansja01_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hanśa: # Noun (1) hanśa 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hanśa+N+Sg+Nom: hanśa
     hanśa+N+Sg+Gen: hanśa
     hanśa+N+Sg+Par: hanśat
     hanśa+N+Sg+Ill: [hanśahtõ, hanśadõ]
     hanśa+N+Sg+Ine: [hanśan, hanśah, hanśahn]
     hanśa+N+Sg+Ela: hanśast
     hanśa+N+Sg+All: hanśalõ
     hanśa+N+Sg+Ade: hanśal
     hanśa+N+Sg+Abl: hanśalt
     hanśa+N+Sg+Tra: hanśas
     hanśa+N+Sg+Ter: hanśaniq
     hanśa+N+Sg+Abe: hanśaldaq
     hanśa+N+Sg+Com: hanśagaq
     hanśa+N+Pl+Nom: hanśaq
     hanśa+N+Pl+Gen: hanśadõ
     hanśa+N+Pl+Par: [hanśasit, hanśasiid]
     hanśa+N+Pl+Ill: [hanśadõhe, hanśadõdõ]
     hanśa+N+Pl+Ine: [hanśadõn, hanśadõh, hanśadõhn]
     hanśa+N+Pl+Ela: hanśadõst
     hanśa+N+Pl+All: hanśadõlõ
     hanśa+N+Pl+Ade: hanśadõl
     hanśa+N+Pl+Abl: hanśadõlt
     hanśa+N+Pl+Tra: hanśadõs
     hanśa+N+Pl+Ter: hanśadõniq
     hanśa+N+Pl+Abe: hanśadõldaq
     hanśa+N+Pl+Com: hanśadõgaq
